Connecticut, session 2026, HB05061.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That section 12-704c of the general statutes be amended to (1) increase
the maximum allowable credit against the personal income tax for a
person's primary residence or motor vehicle from three hundred dollars
to one thousand dollars, (2) increase the minimum allowable credit
threshold, and (3) expand eligibility for the credit by increasing the
qualifying Connecticut adjusted gross income thresholds set forth in
said section.